New Jersey, session 221, A1624.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, a child care provider shall be prohibited from charging a parent any fees for child care services on days when the provider or an assistant provider, substitute provider, alternate provider, or other employee of the provider is unable to provide such services due to contraction of, or exposure to, the coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19). b.  As used in this act, child care provider means a child care provider operating a facility licensed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1983, c.492 (C.30:5B-1 et seq.) or a family day care provider registered pursuant to P.L 1987, c. 27 (C.30:5B-16). 2.  A child care provider who, prior to enactment of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), charged a parent any fees for child care services on days when the provider or an assistant provider, substitute provider, alternate provider, or other employee of the provider was unable to provide such services due to contraction of, or exposure to, COVID-19 shall reimburse that parent in the amount equal to the fees the provider charged the parent. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately and section 2 of this act shall be retroactive to December 1, 2021.